Massachusetts, session 194th, H1448.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “opportunities,” in line 10, the
following:- , including individuals with severe intellectual disabilities, autism spectrum
disorders, and other developmental disabilities.
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said Chapter 15A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out after the word “beyond,” in line 19, the following:- and
SECTION 3. Said section 1 of chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 19, the word “and.”
SECTION 4. Said section 1 of said chapter 15A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 23, the word “levels” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:- levels; and
of 4

(d) to provide inclusive opportunities for individuals with severe intellectual disabilities,
autism spectrum disorders, and other developmental disabilities in order to improve academic
achievement, employment, and independent living, and to enhance the learning environment for
all students.
SECTION 5. The fourth paragraph of Section 7 of said Chapter 15A, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “students,” in line 33, the following:- , and students
with severe intellectual disabilities, autism spectrum disorders, and other developmental
disabilities.
SECTION 6. The second paragraph of Section 7A of said Chapter 15A, as so appearing,
is hereby amended by striking out the word “and,” in lines 24 and 82; and by inserting after the
word “sources,” in lines 25 and 83, the following:- ; and (10) improving access for students with
severe intellectual disabilities, autism spectrum disorders, and other developmental disabilities.
SECTION 7. Section 19 of said Chapter 15A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the third paragraph, the following paragraph:- Such guidelines shall provide
tuition and fee waivers for students with severe intellectual disabilities, autism spectrum
disorders, and other developmental disabilities participating in courses and campus activities
pursuant to section 39A. The commonwealth, not the institutions of public higher education,
shall bear the cost of such tuition and fee waivers.
SECTION 8. Said Chapter 15A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 39 the following section:-
Section 39A. Students with severe intellectual disabilities, autism spectrum disorders, and
other developmental disabilities enrolled in public secondary schools shall be allowed to enroll
of 4

in credit-bearing and noncredit courses in public higher education institutions in the
commonwealth that include nondisabled students, including enrollment in credit-bearing courses
in audit status for students who may not meet course prerequisites or requirements, with
necessary supports, services, and accommodations provided by the student’s school committee,
to facilitate the student’s enrollment and to support inclusion in academic courses,
extracurricular activities, internships, work experiences, and other aspects of the institution of
higher education’s regular postsecondary program and provide a free and appropriate public
education. Such students shall not be required to: take any standardized college entrance aptitude
test; have a high school diploma or its equivalent; meet minimum academic course requirements;
meet minimum grade point average requirements; or obtain a passing score on the statewide
assessment tests , utilized as a basis for competency determinations pursuant to section 1D of
Chapter 69 of the General Laws.
SECTION 9. Said Chapter 15A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 27 the following section: 27A:-
Section 27A. The board of higher education, in consultation with the executive office of
education, the department of elementary and secondary education, and the executive office of
health and human services shall take steps necessary to include students with intellectual
disabilities, autism spectrum disorders, and other developmental disabilities in the residence life
of all public institutions of higher education, with accommodations, supports, and services
necessary to enable inclusive dormitory living.
SECTION 10. The executive office of education shall promulgate guidelines pursuant to
section 17 of chapter 71B of the General Laws on or before January 1, 2027.
of 4

SECTION 11. Section 2 of Chapter 71B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting the following phrase after the tenth item of the third paragraph:-
; and (12) For older students ages 18-22, options including continuing education,
enrollment in credit and noncredit courses that include students without disabilities in an
institution of higher education, development of independent living skills, development of skills
necessary for seeking, obtaining, and maintaining jobs, development of skills to access
community services, and development of skills for self-management of medical needs.
of 4